Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1009
Certified service areas; modification; application; transfer of facilities and customers; considerations; impairment of rights prohibited.

(1) When one supplier at the date of enactment has customers or distribution facilities extending into the certified service area of another supplier, the customers and distribution facilities of the former supplier may be acquired by negotiation or by application of either party to the board for modification of certified service area as to ownership of facilities and customers to be served.

(2) Such amendment may be made by mutual agreement, or upon application of either party to and determination by the board, upon consideration of the factors set forth in section 70-1007, except that no transfer of facilities and customers shall be made which would impair the rights of bondholders or mortgage holders.

Laws 1963, c. 397, § 9, p. 1263;

Laws 1979, LB 223, § 3.